Hawaii statutes.
[§346-394] Jurisdiction. The family
courts established pursuant to chapter 571 shall have exclusive jurisdiction
over proceedings brought under this part. [L 2013, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next